





What is competition? definition and meaning - BusinessDictionary.com 

























competition






















Definition













+ Create New Flashcard








Related Terms






										 Economics: Rivalry in which every seller tries to get what other sellers are seeking at the same time: sales, profit, and market share by offering the best practicable combination of price, quality, and service. Where the market information flows freely, competition plays a regulatory function in balancing demand and supply. 







										regional stock...									





										business risk									





										Clayton Act									





										imperfect compe...									





										full and open c...									





										strategic distr...									





										voluntary expor...									





										wide economic m...									





										tactical pricin...									









Use 'competition' in a Sentence


The company was under serious competition from overseas companies which could manufacture a similar product for much less thanks to lower employee wages.





47
												people found this helpful
											










The competition we experienced when entering the market place was thrilling enough to ensure that we would stay for a long time.





14
												people found this helpful
											









 



You Also Might Like...






                                Karen Sorensen                            

                                Tips to Effective Marketing for Start-Ups                            

                            			Starting a new business takes a lot of research and planning. The marketing portion of your business plan is one of the most important parts of your overall business strategy. Successful marketing methods will turn a customer's needs into a desire ...                            			Read more

 












                                Lyndsey McLaughlin                            

                                How to Stand Out from the Competition                            













                                Karen Sorensen                            

                                Effective Sales Techniques for Small Business                            













                                Debbie Dragon                            

                                Writing a Business Plan: 9 Essential Sections                            













                                Adam Colgate                            

                                How to Make Money in Globalization                            







Notable Quotable



										The Price of Competition									

										"Competition is valuable. Don't give it away; instead, get paid to play. For example, if someone asks you to bid, merely to increase competition and with no intention of giving the product/service/deal to you, require sufficient compensation. They probably won't pay you an actual fee to participate, but you might be able to get bid preparation expenses, or a "last look" provision (in which you get the deal if you match the best price), or you might ask them to quote a price which you either accept or reject, or you might ask for a guaranteed contract at the bid price. When deciding how much compensation you deserve in order to bid, keep in mind these potential hidden costs: the labor involved in putting together the bid; the fact that the bid requester (and potentially your competitors and customers) will learn what you're willing to pay; and the chance that your existing customers will want a better deal."
									

										- Tom Murcko									



										Competition and Maintaining Growth									

										"Internet companies are on a treadmill where you need to move forward just to remain in place. If what you offer isn't getting better every year, existing and new competitors will pass you by."
									

										- Tom Murcko									



										A Retrospective Look at One CEO's Statement									

										"I'm in a race to take CBS out of business.... That's why we're going to make the big bucks. (Josh Harris, founder of the streaming media company Pseudo.com, which went out of business a few months later)"
									

										- Josh Harris									



										How much power do your suppliers have?									

										"Convincing customers to buy your products is tough enough without suppliers giving you a hard time. Basic rule of thumb: The fewer the number of suppliers, the more sway they have. Take the steel industry, which relies on a handful of companies for its iron feedstock. If two of those big guys should get together--as BHP Billton and Rio Tinto have been discussing--they would have significant pricing power, potentially crimping steel producers' margins. On the flipside, beware getting hooked on low-cost providers who don't keep an eye on quality. ("Lead-laced" Barbie, anyone?)"
									

										- Brett Nelson									



										What differentiates your product from competitors'?									

										"Few companies can rely on--let alone afford--clever marketing schemes to separate themselves from the competition. Yes, Starbucks made people believe they wanted $4 caffeinated concoctions, and Louis Vuitton lulled people into shelling out $1,500 for denim handbags, but those are the exceptions that prove the rule. If you want to win in business, you need to offer something tangibly valuable that the competition doesn't. Examples: rock-bottom prices (Wal-Mart); ingenious product design (Apple); extreme convenience (Fed Ex)."
									

										- Brett Nelson									



















						Email
					


						Print
					


						Embed
					

Copy & paste this HTML in your website to link to this page
competition





Popular 'Economics, Politics, & Society' Terms




												immediate family												






												dislocated worker												






												business												






												globalization												






												marginal benefit												






												revenue												






												product												










Mentioned in These Terms




												intertype competition												






												Competition in Contracting Act (CICA)												






												monopolistic competition												






												Canadian Competition Act												






												non-price competition												






												indirect competition												






												fair competition												













Browse Dictionary by Letter:
#

								A							

								B							

								C							

								D							

								E							

								F							

								G							

								H							

								I							

								J							

								K							

								L							

								M							

								N							

								O							

								P							

								Q							

								R							

								S							

								T							

								U							

								V							

								W							

								X							

								Y							

								Z							
























Welcome to Competitive Edge Products, Inc  - Save More. Play More.













































1-866-308-5484M-F 7am-5pm Sat 7am-5pm MST
1-866-308-5484












Expert Service.  Easy Returns.  Volume Discounts.  Low Price Guarantee *





















Featured Products




2-Pack - Lifetime Tamarack 90508 Muskie Angler 10-foot Sit On Top Fishing Kayak



(25)





Your Price: $734.99
    

Low Stock, Buy Now! We'll Beat any online price by $10!* Free Shipping








2-Pack - Lifetime Tamarack 90539 Muskie Angler 10-foot Sit On Top Fishing Kayak



(7)





Your Price: $734.99
    

Low Stock, Buy Now! We'll Beat any online price by $10! Free Shipping








Kodiak Canvas 10x14 ft. 6014 8 person Deluxe Canvas Tent



(65)





Your Price: $649.99
    

Low Stock -  Thanks to Burning Man Festival. Order ASAP to get one! Free Shipping








Lifetime 8-ft 42980 Rectangular Tables 4 Pack White Granite Color Top



(21)





Your Price: $348.92
    

In Stock - Usually ships out next business day. 








Lifetime Storage Shed 60120 8 ft x 20 ft Building Kit



(1)






$2,499.99 
 On sale: $2,074.95
    Sale

In stock. Free Shipping








Lifetime Swing Set - 90143 Monkey Bar Playground with Slide (earthtones color)



(72)





Your Price: $974.95
    

In Stock, We Price Match! Free Shipping








Spalding Basketball Ball 63-249e NBA Outdoor Official Size Basketball



(26)






$24.99 
 On sale: $15.99
    Sale

In Stock - Limit 1 per customer Free Shipping








Spalding TF-1000 Legacy 74-716E Basketball Size 7 29.5-inch



(1)






$79.99 
 On sale: $64.99
    Sale

In Stock - Ships same day! Free Shipping











Competitive Edge Products, Inc is an authorized distributor of Lifetime Tables, Chairs, Sheds and Basketball Hoops manufactured by Lifetime Products, Inc in Clearfield Utah. We offer volume pricing discounts on the following items: adjustable tables, Lifetime picnic tables, Lifetime Round Tables, chairs, folding tables, table carts, computer chairs, folding chair carts, portable picnic tables and benches. We also carry a nice selection of camping tables and a canvas tent. Purchase your polyethylene high density plastic Lifetime table today. Take a look at our indoor/outdoor Lifetime basketball hoops, basketball rims, portable basketball hoops, portable basketball goals, In-Ground Basketball Systems, and inground basketball hoops.Grab a basketball accessory, browse our swimming pool basketball equipment, or search our top of the line Mammoth Basketball Systems, and basketball backboards. In the exercise category we offer home fitness equipment, exercise bikes, stationary bikes, mini steppers, speed training and other exercise equipment.View our home office furniture for office desks, leather office chairs, recliner chairs, stacking chairs and executive chairs. Multiple colors of computer chairs, computer desks and reception desks are for sale. Entertainment centers are available for your audio visual needs. Our lightweight Lifetime plastic tables are high quality, robust and easy to transport. Also view our Lifetime tables and chairs furniture. We also offer 4 packs of many versions of our plastic table and plastic chair for discounted shipping rates. Local pickup available on many items in Utah, Colorado and North Carolina. New to our lineup include Performance Design Big Stuff Play sets and Swing Sets We have recently added many from new suppliers that have added a very well rounded selection of Basketball Systems, exercise equipment, and office furniture. These new suppliers include Goalsetter Basketball Systems, Solo Sports, and Escalade Sports. Through these additions, we have added products including Goalrilla basketball hoops, Stiga table tennis tables, inversion tables, dart boards, etc.Click the volume pricing links to view discounted rates. CEP offers one of the largest selections of Lifetime Products competitive edge Sports Equipment and Furniture on the web! We offer free shipping on orders over $1500 and offer shipping discounts on bulk orders. We can match or beat almost any online price on Life time tables and chairs. Manufacturer's full warranty included on purchases. View our many Competitive Edge Product category pages for our large selection of items. 





































Quick View









In Order To Remain Competitive, Companies Determin... | Chegg.com














































                            Textbook Solutions
                            




                            Expert Q&A
                            












Home



 


home / study / business / accounting / accounting questions and answers / In Order To Remain Competitive, Companies Determine ...



Question: In order to remain competitive, companies determin...








In order to remain competitive, companies determine the
competitor’s product costs. Spyglass Inc. creates various types of
industrial glass products.



The company states that these are the costs they have incurred with
regards to Batch 27A: Customer order quantity 500,000 for
July:



Raw materials: $2,000

Molds: $.40

Labor: $10.00 per hr.

Containers: $2.59

Promotion: $1.00

Marketing: $0.20

Manufacturing overhead: $800.00



Checklist:
What type of costs will be involved in this job order? Why?
What type of costs would be included in the manufacturing
overhead per product?
What costs would be period costs?





Expert Answer


The following costs will be involved in the job order A. Costs which can be directly traced to the job order; 1.Raw Materials -$2,000 2.Moulds-$40 3.Labor-$10 per hour 4.Comtainers-$2.59 B.Manuc... view the full answer 





Get this answer with Chegg Study
View this answer



OR

Find your book


Find your book
















Need an extra hand? Browse hundreds of Accounting tutors.



































Bun-Comp













Home
Encyclopedia of Management
 Bun-Comp


		       Bun-Comp
		    
Bundled Goods and Services
Bundling is a marketing tactic that involves offering two or more goods or services as a package deal for a discounted price. Examples of bundling are as widespread as McDonald's value meals and automobiles with features such as air conditioning, sunroofs, and geographical systems. 
Business Continuity Planning
Organizations are faced with a variety of threats and vulnerabilities, and these continue to evolve. Business disruptions can include natural disasters such as floods, fires, hurricanes, and power outages. 
Business Plan
A business plan is a written document used to describe a proposed venture or idea. It typically includes the current state of a business, future vision for the business, target market analysis and challenges, sales and marketing strategies, and funding requirements to reach stated goals. 
Business Process Reengineering
Process reengineering is redesigning or reinventing how we perform our daily work, and it is a concept that is applicable to all industries regardless of size, type, and location.
Business Structure
When forming a new company, one of the first critical decisions is the formal structure that business will take. Issues such as liability, ownership, operating strategy, and taxation are all impacted by the formal structure of the business. 
Cafeteria Plan—Flexible Benefits
A cafeteria plan, also called a flexible benefit plan, allows employees to choose from a menu of optional benefits the ones that best fit their individual needs. Thus, employees can customize their benefit packages. 
Capacity Planning
Capacity planning has seen an increased emphasis due to the financial benefits of the efficient use of capacity plans within material requirements planning systems and other information systems. Insufficient capacity can quickly lead to deteriorating delivery performance, unnecessarily increase work-in-process, and frustrate sales personnel and those in manufacturing. 
Case Method of Analysis
The case method of analysis involves studying actual business situations—written as an in-depth presentation of a company, its market, and its strategic

decisions—in order to improve a manager's or a student's problem-solving ability. Cases typically investigate a contemporary issue in a real-life context. 
Cash Flow Analysis and Statement
Cash flow analysis is a method of analyzing the financing, investing, and operating activities of a company. The primary goal of cash flow analysis is to identify, in a timely manner, cash flow problems as well as cash flow opportunities. 
Cellular Manufacturing
Cellular manufacturing is a manufacturing process that produces families of parts within a single line or cell of machines operated by machinists who work only within the line or cell. A cell is a small scale, clearly-defined production unit within a larger factory. 
Chain of Command Principle
The chain of command, sometimes called the scaler chain, is the formal line of authority, communication, and responsibility within an organization. The chain of command is usually depicted on an organizational chart, which identifies the superior and subordinate relationships in the organizational structure. 
Chaos Theory
Chaos theory is a scientific principle describing the unpredictability of systems. Most fully explored and recognized during the mid-to-late 1980s, its premise is that systems sometimes reside in chaos, generating energy but without any predictability or direction. 
Coalition Building
Coalitions refer to the temporary formation of persons, groups, or even nations for some type of joint or common action. It has been used as a term most often in relation to political or national issues, such as President George H. 
Communication
Communication is the sharing or exchange of thought by oral, written, or nonverbal means. To function effectively, managers need to know and be able to apply strategically a variety of communication skills that match varying managerial tasks. 
Competitive Advantage
Many firms strive for a competitive advantage, but few truly understand what it is or how to achieve and keep it. A competitive advantage can be gained by offering the consumer a greater value than the competitors, such as by offering lower prices or providing quality services or other benefits that justify a higher price. 
Competitive Intelligence
Intelligence is information that has been analyzed for decision making. It is important to understand the difference between information and intelligence. 
Complexity Theory
The basic premise of complexity theory is that there is a hidden order to the behavior (and evolution) of complex systems, whether that system is a national economy, an ecosystem, an organization, or a production line. In business and finance, complexity theory places its focus on the ways a factory or company resemble an ecosystem or market, rather than a machine "whose parts and functions have been plucked out in advance," according to David Berreby. 
Computer-Aided Design and Manufacturing
Computer-aided design (CAD), also known as computer-aided design and drafting (CADD), involves the entire spectrum of drawing with the aid of a computer—from straight lines to custom animation. In practice, CAD refers to software for the design of engineering and architectural solutions, complete with two- and three-dimensional modeling capabilities.
Computer-Integrated Manufacturing
Computer-integrated manufacturing (CIM) is the use of computer techniques to integrate manufacturing activities. These activities encompass all functions necessary to translate customer needs into a final product. 



















Competitive Advantage - strategy, style, advantages, definition, model, company, business













Home
Encyclopedia of Management
 Bun-Comp
 Competitive Advantage



      COMPETITIVE ADVANTAGE
    










Photo by: zphoto



      Many firms strive for a competitive advantage, but few truly understand
      what it is or how to achieve and keep it. A competitive advantage can be
      gained by offering the consumer a greater value than the competitors, such
      as by offering lower prices or providing quality services or other
      benefits that justify a higher price. The strongest competitive advantage
      is a strategy that that cannot be imitated by other companies.
    

      Competitive advantage can be also viewed as any activity that creates
      superior value above its rivals. A company wants the gap between perceived
      value and cost of the product to be greater than the competition.
    

      Michael Porter defines three generic strategies that firm's may use
      to gain competitive advantage: cost leadership, differentiation, and
      focus. A firm utilizing a cost leadership strategy seeks to be the
      low-cost producer relative to its competitors. A differentiation strategy
      requires that the firm possess a "non-price" attribute that
      distinguishes the firm as superior to its peers. Firms following a focus
      approach direct their attention to narrow product lines, buyer segments,
      or geographic markets. "Focused" firms will use cost or
      differentiation to gain advantage, but only within a narrow target market.
    

      COST ADVANTAGE RESULTING
      
      FROM EFFICIENCY
    

      Efficiency is the ratio of inputs to outputs. Inputs can be any materials,
      overhead, or labor that is assigned to the product or service. The outputs
      can be measured as the number of products produced or services performed.
      The firm that can achieve the highest efficiency for the same service or
      product can widen the gap between cost and perceived value and may have
      greater profit margins.
    

      There are many ways a company can increase efficiency. Efficiency is
      enhanced if, holding outputs constant, inputs are reduced; or if holding
      inputs constant, outputs are increased. Inputs can be reduced in many
      ways. Labor inputs can be reduced if employees are better trained so that
      time spent on each individual output is decreased.
    

      Decreasing waste can decrease materials needed. If a method can be devised
      to decrease waste, it would increase efficiency. For instance, a bottling
      plant might determine that 10 gallons of liquid are spilled every day as a
      result of the bottling process. If the amount of lost liquid can be
      reduced, efficiency will increase.
    

      Outputs can be increased by increasing the number of units a machine can
      produce in given period of time. Decreasing downtime can also increase
      outputs. For example, if a machine regularly breaks down and is out of
      order for two hours a day, finding a way to eliminate this downtime would
      increase the number of outputs.
    

      It is often argued that large companies, by definition, are able to be
      more efficient because they can achieve economies of scale that others are
      not able to reach. Large companies usually offer more products in each
      product line, and their products may help to satisfy many different needs.
      If a consumer is not sure of the exact product he needs, he can go to the
      larger producer and be confident that the larger producer has something to
      offer. The consumer might believe that the smaller producer may be too
      specialized. Larger companies can cater to a larger population because of
      sheer size, while smaller companies have fewer resources and must
      specialize or fall victim to larger, more efficient companies.
    

      PRODUCT DIFFERENTIATION
    

      Product differentiation is achieved by offering a valued variation of the
      physical product. The ability to differentiate a product varies greatly
      along a continuum depending on the specific product. There are some
      products that do not lend themselves to much differentiation, such as
      beef, lumber, and notebook paper. Some products, on the other hand, can be
      highly differentiated. Appliances, restaurants, automobiles, and even
      batteries can all be customized and highly differentiated to meet various
      consumer needs. In 
      
        Principles of Marketing
      
       (1999), authors Gary Armstrong and Philip Kotler note that
      differentiation can occur by manipulating many characteristics, including
      features, performance, style, design, consistency, durability,
      reliability, or reparability. Differentiation allows a company to target
      specific populations.
    

      It is easy to think of companies that have used these characteristics to
      promote their products. Maytag has differentiated itself by presenting
      "Old reliable," the Maytag repairman who never has any work
      to do because Maytag's products purportedly function without any
      problems and do not require repairs. The Eveready Battery Co./Energizer
      has promoted their products' performance with the Energizer Bunny
      
        ®
      
       that "keeps going and going."
    

      Many chain restaurants differentiate themselves with consistency and
      style. If a consumer has a favorite dish at her local Applebee's
      restaurant, she can be assured it will look and taste the same at any
      Applebee's restaurant anywhere in the country. And, the style of
      theme restaurants is the key to some establishments. Planet Hollywood and
      Hard Rock Cafe profit from their themes.
    

      In the auto industry, durability is promoted by Chevrolet's
      "Like a Rock" advertising campaign.
    

      SERVICE DIFFERENTIATION
    

      Companies can also differentiate the services that accompany the physical
      product. Two companies can offer a similar physical product, but the
      company that offers additional services can charge a premium for the
      product. Mary Kay cosmetics offers skin-care and glamour cosmetics that
      are very similar to those offered by many other cosmetic companies; but
      these products are usually accompanied with an informational,
      instructional training session provided by the consultant. This additional
      service allows Mary Kay to charge more for their product than if they sold
      the product through more traditional channels.
    

      In the personal computer business, Dell and Gateway claim to provide
      excellent technical support services to handle any glitches that may occur
      once a consumer has bought their product. This 24-hour-a-day tech support
      provides a very important advantage over other PC makers, who may be
      perceived as less reliable when a customer needs immediate assistance with
      a problem.
    

      PEOPLE DIFFERENTIATION
    

      Hiring and training better people than the competitor can become an
      immeasurable competitive advantage for a company. A company's
      employees are 
       often overlooked, but should be given careful consideration. This human
      resource-based advantage is difficult for a competitor to imitate because
      the source of the advantage may not be very apparent to an outsider. As a 
      
        Money
      
       magazine article reported, Herb Kelleher, CEO of Southwest Airlines,
      explains that the culture, attitudes, beliefs, and actions of his
      employees constitute his strongest competitive advantage: "The
      intangibles are more important than the tangibles because you can always
      imitate the tangibles; you can buy the airplane, you can rent the ticket
      counter space. But the hardest thing for someone to emulate is the spirit
      of your people."
    

      This competitive advantage can encompass many areas. Employers who pay
      attention to employees, monitoring their performance and commitment, may
      find themselves with a very strong competitive advantage. A well-trained
      production staff will generate a better quality product. Yet, a competitor
      may not be able to distinguish if the advantage is due to superior
      materials, equipment or employees.
    

      People differentiation is important when consumers deal directly with
      employees. Employees are the frontline defense against waning customer
      satisfaction. The associate at Wal-Mart who helps a customer locate a
      product may result in the customer returning numerous times, generating
      hundreds of dollars in revenue. Home Depot prides itself on having a
      knowledgeable sales staff in their home improvement warehouses. The
      consumer knows that the staff will be helpful and courteous, and this is
      very important to the consumer who may be trying a new home improvement
      technique with limited knowledge on the subject.
    

      Another way a company can differentiate itself through people is by having
      a recognizable person at the top of the company. A recognizable CEO can
      make a company stand out. Some CEOs are such charismatic public figures
      that to the consumer, the CEO is the company. If the CEO is considered
      reputable and is well-liked, it speaks very well for the company, and
      consumers pay attention. National media coverage of CEOs has increased
      tremendously, jumping 21 percent between 1992 and 1997 (Gaines-Ross).
    

      IMAGE DIFFERENTIATION
    

      Armstrong and Kotler pointed out in 
      
        Principles of Marketing
      
       that when competing products or services are similar, buyers may perceive
      a difference based on company or brand image. Thus companies should work
      to establish images that differentiate them from competitors. A favorable
      brand image takes a significant amount of time to build. Unfortunately,
      one negative impression can kill the image practically overnight.
      Everything that a company does must support their image. Ford Motor
      Co.'s former "Quality is Job 1" slogan needed to be
      supported in every aspect, including advertisements, production, sales
      floor presentation, and customer service.
    

      Often, a company will try giving a product a personality. It can be done
      through a story, symbol, or other identifying means. Most consumers are
      familiar with the Keebler Elves and the magic tree where they do all of
      the Keebler baking. This story of the elves and the tree gives Keebler
      cookies a personality. When consumers purchase Keebler cookies, they are
      not just purchasing cookies, but the story of the elves and the magic tree
      as well. A symbol can be an easily recognizable trademark of a company
      that reminds the consumer of the brand image. The Nike
      "swoosh" is a symbol that carries prestige and makes the
      Nike label recognizable.
    

      QUALITY DIFFERENTIATION
    

      Quality is the idea that something is reliable in the sense that it does
      the job it is designed to do. When considering competitive advantage, one
      cannot just view quality as it relates to the product. The quality of the
      material going into the product and the quality of production operations
      should also be scrutinized. Materials quality is very important. The
      manufacturer that can get the best material at a given price will widen
      the gap between perceived quality and cost. Greater quality materials
      decrease the number of returns, reworks, and repairs necessary. Quality
      labor also reduces the costs associated with these three expenses.
    

      INNOVATION DIFFERENTIATION
    

      When people think of innovation, they usually have a narrow view that
      encompasses only product innovation. Product innovation is very important
      to remain competitive, but just as important is process innovation.
      Process innovation is anything new or novel about the way a company
      operates. Process innovations are important because they often reduce
      costs, and it may take competitors a significant amount of time to
      discover and imitate them.
    

      Some process innovations can completely revolutionize the way a product is
      produced. When the assembly line was first gaining popularity in the early
      twentieth century, it was an innovation that significantly reduced costs.
      The first companies to use this innovation had a competitive advantage
      over the companies that were slow or reluctant to change.
    

      As one of the first Internet service providers, America Online offered a
      unique innovation for accessing the nascent Internet—its unique and
      user-friendly 
       interface. The company grew at a massive rate, leading the rapidly
      developing Internet sector as a force in American business. While most
      innovations are not going to revolutionize the way that all firms operate,
      the small innovations can reduce costs by thousands or even millions of
      dollars, and large innovations may save billions over time.
    

      SUSTAINABLE COMPETITIVE
      
      ADVANTAGE
    

      The achievement of competitive advantage is not always permanent or even
      long lasting. Once a firm establishes itself in an area of advantage,
      other firms will follow suit in an effort to capitalize on their
      similarities. A firm is said to have a "sustainable"
      competitive advantage when its competitors are unable to duplicate the
      benefits of the firm's strategy. In order for a firm to attain a
      "sustainable" competitive advantage, its generic strategy
      must be grounded in an attribute that meets four criteria. It must be:
    


        Valuable—it is of value to consumers.
      

        Rare—it is not commonplace or easily obtained.
      

        Inimitable—it cannot be easily imitated or copied by competitors.
      

        Non-substitutable—consumers cannot or will not substitute another
        product or attribute for the one providing the firm with competitive
        advantage.
      


      SELECTING A COMPETITIVE ADVANTAGE
    

      A company may be lucky enough to identify several potential competitive
      advantages, and it must be able to determine which are worth pursuing. Not
      all differentiation is important. Some differences are too subtle, too
      easily mimicked by competitors, and many are too expensive. A company must
      be sure the consumer wants, understands, and appreciates the difference
      offered.
    

      The maker of expensive suits may offer its suits in the widest array of
      colors, but if 95 percent of the consumers wear only black and navy blue
      suits, then the wide array of colors adds little perceived value to the
      product. Variety would not become a competitive advantage, and would be a
      waste of resources. A difference may be worth developing and promoting,
      advise Armstrong and Kotler, if it is important, distinctive, superior,
      communicable, preemptive, affordable, and profitable.
    

      A competitive advantage can make or break a firm, so it is crucial that
      all managers are familiar with competitive advantages and how to create,
      maintain, and benefit from them.
    



          SEE ALSO:
        

          Economies of Scale and Economies of Scope
        
        ; 
        
          Porter's 5-Forces Model
        





          Dena
        

          Waggoner
        



          Revised by
        

          R.
        

          Anthony
        

          Inman
        




        FURTHER READING:
      

        Armstrong, Gary, and Philip Kotler. 
        
          Principles of Marketing.
        
         8th ed. Upper Saddle River, NJ: Prentice Hall, 1999.
      

        Dess, Gregory G., G.T. Lumpkin, and Alan B. Eisner. 
        
          Strategic Management: Text and Cases.
        
         Boston: McGraw-Hill Irwin, 2006.
      

        Gaines-Ross, Leslie, and Chris Komisarjevsky. "The Brand Name
        CEO." 
        
          Across the Board
        
         36, no. 6, (1999): 26–29.
      

        Kelleher, Herb, and Sarah Rose. "How Herb Keeps Southwest
        Hopping." 
        
          Money,
        
         28, 1999, 61–62.
      

        Raturi, Amitabh S., and James R. Evans. 
        
          Principles of Operations Management.
        
         Mason, OH: Thomson South-Western, 2005.
      










Also read article about Competitive Advantage from Wikipedia

User Contributions:
 1 TarikuJul 1, 2011 @ 9:09 amWhat are many strategies that can be employeed to make the firmsustainable and competative?

Comment about this article, ask questions, or add new information about this topic:





Name:



E-mail:



Show my email publicly



Type the code shown:








Public Comment: (50-4000 characters)





 Send comment



 
Competitive Advantage forum




			Communication
		

			Competitive Intelligence
		 




















Competitive Positioning | Marketing MO


























































Legacy Planning and Management App User Access 


Marketing MO - A Comprehensive Marketing Planning App
Home
Strategic Marketing Course
Services
About
Guides
Sign Up
Course Log In
 






Marketing Guides




Home  ›  Guides  ›  Competitive Positioning 






Share on Facebook
Share on Twitter
Share on Google+


 
Strategic Planning
Competitive Positioning

What sets your product, service and company apart from your competitors? What value do you provide and how is it different from the alternatives?
Competitive positioning is about defining how you’ll “differentiate” your offering and create value for your market. It’s about carving out a spot in the competitive landscape, putting your stake in the ground, and winning mindshare in the marketplace – being known for a certain “something.”
A good positioning strategy is influenced by:

Market profile: Size, competitors, stage of growth
Customer segments: Groups of prospects with similar wants & needs
Competitive analysis: Strengths, weaknesses, opportunities and threats in the landscape
Method for delivering value: How you deliver value to your market at the highest level

[Note: You can access interactive marketing planning templates and download step-by-step plans for positioning your product or service in the marketplace in our marketing planning and management app. Try it for free.]


When your market clearly sees how your offering is different from that of your competition, it’s easier to influence the market and win mindshare. Without differentiation, it takes more time and budget to entice the market to engage with you; as a result, many companies end up competing on price – a tough position to sustain over the long term.
One of the key elements that many small to mid-size companies overlook is how they provide value at the highest level. There are three essential methods for delivering value: operational excellence, product leadership and customer intimacy.
Here is a hypothetical example of each type of value.



OPERATIONAL EXCELLENCE
PRODUCT LEADERSHIP
CUSTOMER INTIMACY



Herringer customers don’t want bells and whistles; they just want a good product at the lowest possible price.
Herringer focuses on operational excellence so they can continually offer the lowest price in the market. For example, they just patented a new machine that dramatically lowers their manufacturing costs. They’re not trying to create new or better products; they just want to produce more volume at a lower cost.
Herringer’s method for delivering value is operational excellence; it’s a key driver of their long-term strategy, and their positioning reflects it.


Orange Technology’s customers care most about quality – they want the best product.
Orange is completely dedicated to innovation and quality. They’re constantly working on product improvements and new ideas to bring to market.
They know what their competitors are doing and are completely focused on staying one step ahead in order to capture a greater share of their market.
Orange’s brand and culture is all about product leadership; their market recognizes it and is willing to pay for it.


Starboard’s market is flooded with products at all points of the price spectrum.
Yet, Starboard’s customers want more than a product off the shelf; they want customized solutions. So Starboard’s strategy is to know as much as possible about their customers’ businesses so they can deliver the correct solutions over time.
Starboard knows that they can’t just say “We offer great service.” Starboard delivers on their strategy in every interaction with their market.




 
These companies have a complete understanding of how they deliver value to their market. It’s part of their strategy, which makes it easier for them to win a position in their respective markets.
Here’s another way to think of it:
You can provide the best offering, the cheapest offering, or the most comprehensive offering, but you can’t provide all three.
Another key factor in your competitive positioning is your competition. Sure, you need to put your stake in the ground and claim your turf. But is it turf that you can own? Can you realistically beat your competition to own it?
Rather than leaving your market positioning to chance, establish a strategy. What you’re ultimately striving for is to be known for something – to own mindshare of the market. This is typically easier for consumer product lines than for B2B companies, because positioning a single product against three to five competitors is a simpler task than positioning a mid-size B2B company with numerous offerings in numerous markets.
Owning a strong position in the market is challenging for most small- to mid-size companies, but you have a better chance of achieving it if you clearly define a strategy and build your brand around it.
Do you see your company in any of these scenarios?



Best Case
Neutral Case
Worst Case



You provide a one-of-a-kind offering that your market needs and wants; you have strong differentiation from your competitors.
Your market knows your name and associates it with that “one thing” that you’re known for.
And you continually deliver on it – perception is reality – so you continue to win mindshare in your market, defending your turf and influencing your market.


Your offering is somewhat different from – and better than – those of your competitors, and you communicate that difference (though probably not as consistently as you should).
Some of your market knows your name, but they describe you in different ways; you’re not yet known for that “one thing,” but at least you’re occasionally recognized.
You know that you could make a greater impact on your market with stronger positioning.


Your market sees little difference between you and your competitors, and your name is not recognized.
Because of this, you have to spend precious budget and time educating the market at each touch point.
You often end up competing solely on price, though your business isn’t optimized to continue profitably with falling prices.
You have to fight long and hard for every sale. It’s very difficult to meet your revenue and profit goals.






Not Sure Where to Start with Competitive Positioning?
Access detailed step-by-step plans in our new marketing website. It’s free to use
Get Access


The concept of positioning is entirely strategic. It’s the first element to address in strategic marketing, and everything else is aligned to it. Jack Trout and Al Ries defined the concept years ago in their landmark book Positioning: The Battle for Your Mind.
While the concept is simple – to be known for a single thing in the mind of the customer – the road to achieve it can be complex. It’s best to have a clear understanding of your market –demographics, segments, their pains, how well you and your competitors provide solutions, how you truly provide value, and your strengths and weaknesses – before making this decision.
An fully-informed decision is vital, because you’ll allocate a significant amount of resources in your journey to achieve it.

Competitive Positioning Key Concepts & Steps
Before you begin
Your competitive positioning strategy is the foundation of your entire business – it’s the first thing you should pin down if you’re launching a new company or product. It’s also important when you’re expanding or looking for a new edge.
Profile your market

Document the size of your market, and identify your major competitors and how they’re positioned.
Determine whether your market is in the introductory, growth, mature, or declining stage of its life. This “lifecycle stage” affects your entire marketing strategy.

Segment your market

Understand the problems that your market faces. Talk with prospects and customers, or conduct research if you have the time, budget and opportunity. Uncover their true wants and needs – you’ll learn a great deal about what you can deliver to solve their problems and beat your competitors.
Group your prospects into “segments” or “personas” that have similar problems and can use your offering in similar ways. By grouping prospects into segments or personas, you can efficiently market to each group.

Define how you deliver value

At the highest level, there are three core types of value that a company can deliver: operational efficiency (the lowest price), product leadership (the best product), or customer intimacy (the best solution & service). Determine which one you’re best equipped to deliver; your decision is your method for delivering value.

Evaluate your competition

List your competitors. Include any that can solve your customers’ problems, even if the competitors’ solutions are much different from yours – they’re still your competition.
Rate yourself and your direct competitors based on operational efficiency (price), product leadership and customer intimacy. It’s easy to think you’re the best, so be as impartial as you can be.

Stake a position

Identify areas where your competition is vulnerable.
Determine whether you can focus on those vulnerable areas – they’re major opportunities.
Make a decision on how to position your offering or company.

Select the mindshare you want to own, and record your strategy

Review the components of your market and evaluate what you want to be known for in the future. Condense all your research and analysis into the “one thing” that you want to be known for, and design your long-term strategy to achieve it.

After Competitive Positioning
Once you have a competitive positioning strategy, develop a brand strategy to help you communicate your positioning and solidify your value every time you touch your market. Together, these two strategies are the essential building blocks for your business.
Check out our positioning and brand strategy tools if you’d like guidance.



 







COMPETITIVE POSITIONING TEMPLATES / MARKETING PLANS / PROJECT MANAGEMENT
EVERYTHING YOU NEED FOR YOUR MARKETING PROJECT
Access Here





Competitive Positioning
StrategyFree!

Detailed Guidance for Designing and Mapping Your Competitive Positioning Strategy

Our marketing planning and management app contains detailed guidance for you to determine:

Where you stand in today’s marketplace
The mindshare you desire to own
Your true value proposition
Your customers’ pains
Quantitative and qualitative market research
Your market lifecycle and proper positioning approach


Access Here






Marketing MO

Log In
Sign Up
Legacy Account Login



Resources

Strategic Marketing Course
About
Download Our Book
Marketing Guides



Connect

LinkedIn
Twitter
Facebook
Email




Sign up for Strategic Tips





  










This iframe contains the logic required to handle AJAX powered Gravity Forms.
 


					© Copyright Qlutch Marketing, Inc 2006-17  |  Privacy Policy  |  Terms Of Use  |  Site Map  |  Contact





























Guides | Marketing MO - A Comprehensive Marketing Planning App















































Legacy Planning and Management App User Access 


Marketing MO - A Comprehensive Marketing Planning App
Home
Strategic Marketing Course
Services
About
Guides
Sign Up
Course Log In
 





Marketing Guides





Strategic Planning

Creative & Brand Development

Campaigns & Execution

News & Updates






Home  ›  Guides 
Page 1 of 1212345...10...»Last »
  





Jun 21st, 2017  |
Strategic Planning

Marketing with Purpose
One of my favorite quotes is from the late Peter Drucker: “Marketing is the distinguishing, unique function of the business.” On first glance, it’s not an earth shattering quote. But there are plenty of case studies about companies that delivered average products yet became distinguished because of their marketing (think Coca Cola, Nike, Corona, Microsoft,…Read More



Share on Facebook
Share on Twitter
Share on Google+

 





May 02nd, 2017  |
Campaigns & Execution

Generating B2B Sales Leads
If you’re a B2B marketer, the main focus of your job is probably generating leads for your sales team. It’s common for B2B marketers of small to mid-size companies struggle to produce qualified sales leads because they don’t have a strong understanding of the nuances of selling B2B products and services. The more complex of…Read More



Share on Facebook
Share on Twitter
Share on Google+

 





Apr 12th, 2017  |
Creative & Brand Development

How to Develop Better Messages
How do you respond when someone asks “what does your company do?” Do all your team members answer the same way? And is your response compelling so the listener wants to learn more, or do you sound like everyone else (blah, blah, blah…)? “Messages” are written and verbal statements that quickly describe what you do…Read More



Share on Facebook
Share on Twitter
Share on Google+

 





Mar 21st, 2017  |
Strategic Planning

How to Create a Compelling Brand Story
Great brands make an emotional connection with their market. And in today’s digital world, that can be more complicated than ever. Customers’ expectations of brands are changing, and we’re undergoing a massive shift in how we deliver that brand experience. Some brands won’t survive. But it’s still early in the shift. Even if you’re an…Read More



Share on Facebook
Share on Twitter
Share on Google+

 





Feb 08th, 2017  |
Strategic Planning

Discover Your Competitive Advantage
Why do your customers buy from you instead of your competitors? When asked that same question, research shows that nearly 4,000 CEOs of mid-market companies don’t know the real answer. Some think they do, but most are relying on false information. And this limits their ability to grow. In Jaynie Smith’s book Creating Competitive Advantage, only…Read More



Share on Facebook
Share on Twitter
Share on Google+

 





Jan 24th, 2017  |
Strategic Planning

Understanding the Psychology of Your Buyer
Here’s a secret of great marketers: They truly understand the psychology of their buyer. Marketing is about persuasion: creating the impression you want to make, eliciting a specific feeling or response, and then enticing a person to take action. If that sounds difficult, you’re right – it can be. The great advertisers of yesteryear kept…Read More



Share on Facebook
Share on Twitter
Share on Google+

 





Jan 09th, 2017  |
Strategic Planning

Top 4 Benefits of a Written Strategic Marketing Plan
Big brands almost always invest substantial resources to create a comprehensive strategic marketing plan. Especially in consumer markets. Yet from my experience, few small to midsize businesses bother to create one. (And many don’t even create a written annual marketing plan, opting to simply operate from a budget instead.) Why? Part of the reason is…Read More



Share on Facebook
Share on Twitter
Share on Google+

 





Dec 06th, 2016  |
News & Updates

Introducing Qlutch – Our New Marketing Planning Web App
After a lot of hard work, we’re proud to announce the launch of Qlutch – our new marketing planning web app. Qlutch delivers almost 400 step-by-step plans for almost any marketing activity and replaces our legacy Marketing MO offering. We invite you to check it out! Here’s what’s new: We’ve streamlined the interface for easier…Read More



Share on Facebook
Share on Twitter
Share on Google+

 





Nov 17th, 2016  |
Strategic Planning

Customer Retention Strategy
How much have you invested in sales and marketing over the last few years? Thousands? Tens of thousands? Millions? Tens of millions? Your customer retention strategy is about keeping the customers you’ve invested in to acquire. And if you’re in an industry where your customers make multiple purchases over the years, your entire team should be…Read More



Share on Facebook
Share on Twitter
Share on Google+

 





Oct 19th, 2016  |
Strategic Planning

How to Improve Marketing Planning
“Those who plan do better than those who do not plan, even though they rarely stick to their plan.” – Winston Churchill, British Prime Minister   “Have a plan. Follow the plan, and you’ll be surprised how successful you can be. Most people don’t have a plan. That’s why it’s easy to beat most folks.” – Paul…Read More



Share on Facebook
Share on Twitter
Share on Google+

 





Sep 14th, 2016  |
Campaigns & Execution

Direct Mail Campaign Ideas
For many years, direct mail has been an important marketing medium. Even though many companies have turned to social media, email and internet marketing, a targeted and well-produced mail campaign can still be highly effective. Direct mail campaigns can be used to generate leads, promote special offers, support other campaigns, communicate with customers and raise…Read More



Share on Facebook
Share on Twitter
Share on Google+

 





Aug 23rd, 2016  |
Strategic Planning

How Marketing ROI Calculations Can Get You in Trouble
Over the past decade, there’s been a big push for marketers to improve their use of financial metrics, especially marketing ROI calculations. This enables them to better communicate with the rest of their executive team. Instead of speaking in terms of brand awareness, conversion rates and leads generated, marketers have been focused on speaking in…Read More



Share on Facebook
Share on Twitter
Share on Google+

 





Jul 21st, 2016  |
Strategic Planning

Will Lowering Your Prices Increase Profits?
Revenue is down and you need to take action. In a slow economy, it’s reasonable to assume that if you were to lower your prices, you’d sell more and increase revenue and profits. But is this always true? Maybe, or maybe not. The untrained business person might feel that this was the best pricing strategy,…Read More



Share on Facebook
Share on Twitter
Share on Google+

 





Jul 20th, 2016  |
Strategic Planning

Pricing Strategy
Pricing is one of the classic “4 Ps” of marketing (product, price, place, promotion). It’s one of the key elements of every B2C strategy. Yet for many B2B marketers, the pricing strategy in their marketing plan is challenging to write; many aren’t even involved in creating their pricing strategy. There are many factors to consider…Read More



Share on Facebook
Share on Twitter
Share on Google+

 





Jun 22nd, 2016  |
Creative & Brand Development

Brand Messaging
How do you respond when someone asks “what does your company do?” Do all your team members answer the same way? Is your response compelling enough that the listener wants to learn more, or do you sound like everyone else? Brand messaging addresses the written and verbal statements that quickly describe what you do and how…Read More



Share on Facebook
Share on Twitter
Share on Google+

 





May 26th, 2016  |
News & Updates

A Strategic Marketing Guide
Marketing and sales have changed over the last few years. People no longer trust company-sponsored advertisements. Digital media presents a dizzying array of choices for reaching customers who are becoming harder to influence. The solution for the small to midsize company isn’t a new marketing tactic or social media channel or to “sell harder.” The solution…Read More



Share on Facebook
Share on Twitter
Share on Google+

 





Apr 05th, 2016  |
News & Updates

Our New Strategic Marketing Course Is Now Live!
We’re excited to announce that our new online course – Strategic Marketing for the SME – is now live! This course enables company stakeholders to design sophisticated marketing strategies using the same techniques as the big agencies and Fortune 500. The course guides viewers through the essential elements of any long-term strategic marketing plan. Creating an…Read More



Share on Facebook
Share on Twitter
Share on Google+

 





Mar 22nd, 2016  |
Strategic Planning

Sales Process Management
How do prospects decide to purchase your product or service? Does a single decision maker find a product or service and buy on the spot, or does s/he go through many steps and approvals first? Perhaps there are multiple people or departments involved in the decision, each with their own needs? Your sales process management…Read More



Share on Facebook
Share on Twitter
Share on Google+

 





Mar 09th, 2016  |
News & Updates

Our Private Beta is Now Closed
Thank you to all of our beta participants! The private beta for our upcoming new marketing planning and management app is now closed. We received more requests than slots available, so unfortunately we were not unable to grant test accounts to all requesters. Next Steps We will notify everyone when the new final product is ready for…Read More



Share on Facebook
Share on Twitter
Share on Google+

 





Feb 11th, 2016  |
Campaigns & Execution

5 Tips for Effective Direct Mail Marketing
With all the focus on digital marketing these days, it’s easy to overlook an old trusted medium that can play an important role in your marketing mix. Direct mail isn’t dead. If you’ve been in the marketing field for 20 or more years, you probably have plenty of experience using direct mail. The trick for…Read More



Share on Facebook
Share on Twitter
Share on Google+

 



Page 1 of 1212345...10...»Last »
 






Marketing MO

Log In
Sign Up
Legacy Account Login



Resources

Strategic Marketing Course
About
Download Our Book
Marketing Guides



Connect

LinkedIn
Twitter
Facebook
Email




Sign up for Strategic Tips





  










This iframe contains the logic required to handle AJAX powered Gravity Forms.
 


					© Copyright Qlutch Marketing, Inc 2006-17  |  Privacy Policy  |  Terms Of Use  |  Site Map  |  Contact

























Competitive Edge custom promotional products











Call Us at: (800)458-3343






Quick Search



home   |   about us   |   corporate programs   |  contact us

































 Product Index


 Advanced Search


 Top 10 Products


 Email Product Info 









 -- Shop By Brand -- 
Advantage Line
Bag Makers
BiC
CBUKÂ®
Cross
Cutter & Buck
Elitronix
Express A Button
Fruit of the Loom
Garland
Gildan
Hanes
Igloo
Jerzees
Koozie
Minya Collection
Parker
PING
Port & Company
Port Authority
Post-it
Pro Golf Premiums, Inc
SanMar
Sharpie
Sheaffer
Sport-Tek
Uni-Ball
Zippy
 

 




 -- Shop By Price --  
Under $2.00
$2.00-$3.00
$3.00-$5.00
$5.00-$8.00
$8.00-$10.00
$10.00-$15.00
$15.00-$20.00
$20.00 and Up
 

 




-- Shop By Theme --
Auto Open
Budget
Digital
Direct Mail
Education
Environment
Executive Gifts
Fundraiser
Health
Holiday
Hot Products
Interactive
Music
Patriotic
Personalized
Political
Premium Items
Rush Items
Sports
Tradeshow
 




 

















							
						  Cart is Empty
						  
						  
 





 View Cart Contents 


 Check Out






 Login


 













 Email Product Information


 Request A Quote


 Order A Catalog


 













 How To Order


 About Artwork


 Customer Service


 Email customer Service





                     Support Via  Live Chat







 






     
Choose Language
Spanish
Albanian
Arabic
Bulgarian
Catalan
Chinese
Croatian
Czech
Danish
Dutch
English
Estonian
Filipino
Finnish
French
Galician
German
Greek
Hebrew
Hindi
Hungarian
Indonesian
Italian
Japanese
Korean
Latvian
Lithuanian
Maltese
Norwegian
Polish
Portuguese
Romanian
Russian
Serbian
Slovak
Slovenian
Swedish
Thai
Turkish
Ukrainian
Vietnamese














 



























































Drinkware
Glassware
Cups & Mugs
Stainless Steel
Other Drinkware
Fun & Sports
Childrens Items
Golf Items
Outdoor Items
Games
Apparel
Jackets
Caps and Visors
Shirts
Other Apparel
Electronics
Cameras/Camcorders
Computer
Sound and Audio
Other Electronics


Tradeshow
Giveaways
Apparel & Bags
Food Items
Other Tradeshow
Home & Health
Household Items
Seasonal
Personal Care
Other Home & House
Office
Calculators
Calendars & Planners
Awards
Other Office


Travel
Luggage
Auto Accessories
Travel Kits
Other Travel
Writing
Pens
Pencils
Executive
Other Writing
Custom Products
Light Products
Figures & Toys
Plastic/PVC
Other Custom





 








 

12-oz. Stainless Steel "Stir" Mug 
                              CE-640 
                              
                              As Low As:
                              $3.95
                              
 


 


19 oz. Fold-Flat Reusable Sport Bottle  
                              CE-632 
                              
                              As Low As:
                              $2.25
                              
 

 














Enter your email address to receive notifications for special offers on promotional products.


























1. Gildan Ultra Cotton T-shirt 6.1-ounce


2. Custom Silicone Rubber Wristband


3. 4-oz. Stainless Steel Espresso Cup and Saucer


4. House-Shaped Tape Measure Keychain


5. 5-Function Executive Pedometer


6. 16-oz. Acrylic/Stainless Steel Java "Stir" Mug


7. BiC Clic Stic


8. Cutter & Buck CB DryTecâ„¢ Championship Polo for Men


9. Battery-Powered Hand Fan


10. Gildan Heavy Blendâ„¢ 7.75 oz., 50/50 Hooded Sweatshirt








top 10 details ...















promotional product index | advanced search | sales/closeouts on promotional products 


home | About Us | Careers | Corporate Programs | Contact Us


© 2017 Competitive Edge, Inc.







If you see this message, your web browser doesn't support JavaScript or JavaScript is disabled. 
        Please enable JavaScript in your browser settings so this website can function correctly.

Please follow the instructions below to enable the javascript

Internet Explorer 6, 7 or newer


Click the Tools menu.
Select Internet Options.
Click the Security tab.
Click the Custom Level button.
Scroll down until you see the 'Scripting' section. Select the 'Enable' radio button for 'Active Scripting.'
Click the OK button.
Click the Yes button in the confirmation window. 


Firefox 2, 3 or newer


Click the Tools menu.
Select Options.
Click the Contents tab.
Select the 'Enable JavaScript' checkbox.
Click the OK button.


Safari 2, 3 or newer


Click the Safari menu.
Select Preferences.
Click the Security tab.
Select the 'Enable JavaScript' checkbox.

























Competitive Advantage



















































































 























Topics



What's New



Apple's Magic: Bulls See 8% Upside




Stock Sell-offs on Robust Profits Is a Red Flag


Topics

News
Financial Advisors
Markets
Anxiety Index
Investing
Managing Wealth
ETFs
The Trump Economy
Retirement
Personal Finance
Trading
ETFs Made Simple
Tech
Life Stages
Small Business
Bitcoin





Reference



Dictionary
Term Of The Day

Total Return Swap
A swap agreement in which one party makes payments based on a set rate, either fixed ... 
Read More »



Broker Reviews




Find the best broker for your trading or investing needs
See Reviews



Latest Videos


Influence: Terri Kallsen


Guides

Stock Basics
Economics Basics
Options Basics


Exam Prep

Series 7 Exam
CFA Level 1
Series 65 Exam





Advisors




Advisor Insights
Our network of expert financial advisors field questions from our community.
Ask A Question



Join Advisor Insights
Are you a financial advisor? Showcase your expertise to 20+ million investors.
Join Now



Financial Advisors
Sophisticated content for financial advisors around investment strategies, industry trends, and advisor education.


Find an Advisor

Atlanta
Los Angeles
Boston
New York
Houston





Markets




Markets
The latest markets news, real time quotes, financials and more.



Watchlist
Track stocks and ETFs
Add New Watchlist





Simulator




Stock Simulator
Trade with a starting balance of $100,000 and zero risk!



FX Trader
Trade the Forex market risk free using our free Forex trading simulator.






NEW
                                Academy
                            




Investopedia Academy
Learn from the world's leader in financial education
Check out all courses


Featured Courses



Become a day trader
Start Learning



Excel for Finance
Start Learning



Latest Courses


                                            Become a Day Trader
                                        

                                            Excel for Finance
                                        

                                            Fundamental Investing
                                        

                                            Coming soon: Financial Modeling
                                        

                                            All Courses
                                        






















Site Log In


Advisor Insights Log In



Newsletters

























Competitive Advantage









Share










































Loading the player...
















 

What is 'Competitive Advantage'
Competitive advantages are conditions that allow a company or country to produce a good or service at a lower price or in a more desirable fashion for customers. These conditions allow the productive entity to generate more sales or superior margins than its competition. Competitive advantages are attributed to a variety of factors, including cost structure, brand, quality of product offerings, distribution network, intellectual property and customer support.

      
BREAKING DOWN 'Competitive Advantage'
      Competitive advantages provide an edge over rivals and an ability to generate greater value for a firm and its shareholders. The more sustainable the competitive advantage, the more difficult it is for competitors to neutralize the advantage. The two main types of competitive advantages are comparative advantage and differential advantage.Comparative AdvantageComparative advantage is generated by a firm's ability to produce a good or service at a lower cost than its competitors. This gives the firm the ability sell its goods or services at a lower price than its competition or to generate a larger margin on sales. Rational consumers will choose the cheaper of any two perfect substitutes offered. If the effects of comparative advantage are partially offset by imperfect substitution, higher margins for the lowest-cost producers will eventually benefit shareholders through superior returns or provide the company with more resources for marketing, research and development or administrative infrastructure improvements to support future growth.Comparative advantage can be derived from economies of scale, more efficient internal systems, location in geographies with low labor or low property expenses. These do not always imply the company can produce a better product or service, but rather they can offer a product or service for a lower price. In the context of international trade economics, comparative advantages are determined by opportunity cost, and any part has a comparative advantage at something. Amazon.com Inc. is an example of a company focused on building and maintaining comparative advantage. The e-commerce platform, its vendor relationship and its shipping network provide a level of scale and efficiency that is difficult for retail competitors to replicate. Amazon has risen to prominence largely through price competition.Differential AdvantageA differential advantage is created when a firm's products or services differ from its competitors and are seen as superior than a competitive offering. Differential advantages can be driven by more advanced technology, patent-protected products or processes, superior personnel, or a strong brand identity. These factors support wide margins and large market shares. Apple Inc. is famous for creating innovative products like the iPhone and supporting their market leadership with savvy marketing campaigns to build an elite brand. Major drug companies can also market branded drugs at high price points due to patent protection.






  


 









 




Trading Center




















                                                    Comparative Advantage                                            




                                                    Economic Moat                                            




                                                    Perfect Competition                                            




                                                    National Diamond                                            




                                                    Product Differentiation                                            




                                                    Absolute Advantage                                            




                                                    Value Added                                            




                                                    Dog Eat Dog                                            




                                                    Market Leader                                            




Next Up 

































 

Dictionary:
#
a
b
c
d
e
f
g
h
i
j
k
l
m
n
o
p
q
r
s
t
u
v
w
x
y
z




Content Library
Articles
Terms
Videos
Guides
Slideshows
FAQs
Calculators
Chart Advisor
Stock Analysis
Stock Simulator
FXtrader
Exam Prep Quizzer
Net Worth Calculator




Connect With Investopedia
























Work With Investopedia
About Us
Advertise With Us
Write For Us
Contact Us
Careers




Get Free Newsletters
Newsletters









Work With Investopedia
About Us
Advertise With Us
Write For Us
Contact Us
Careers



© 2017, Investopedia, LLC.

All Rights Reserved
Terms Of Use
Privacy Policy































Inventory Management of Precision Parts & Special Products





























Specialty Resources Inc.









112 Oscar Way - Chester Springs, PA 19425
p. (610) 321.0900




Menu







Specialty Resources, Inc. A Global Sourcing and Inventory Management Company
Learn More












Global Sourcing

Specialty Resources has been a leader in global sourcing for over 30 years, developing and building relationships with manufacturers around the globe. We eliminate the challenges companies face with global sourcing such as high minimums, excessive inventory levels, communication barriers, expensive freight costs, and customs clearances. Our cost savings initiatives ensure that our customers maintain a competitive advantage in pricing while maintaining high-quality products.
Learn More






Industries





Agricultural
Learn More








Commercial
Learn More








Energy
Learn More








Food & Beverage
Learn More








Industrial
Learn More








Transportation
Learn More













Quality Control

Our in-house quality control department ensures that all components supplied meet or exceed our customers’ expectations. As an ISO 9001 certified company, we deliver world class quality products. Our quality control department’s standard operating procedure for all customers incorporates the automotive PPAP quality system for part qualification. SRI partners with outside test labs to perform a full gamut of testing including corrosion resistance, X-Ray, metallurgical analysis and other tests required by our customers.
Learn More






Services





Supply Chain Management
Learn More








Sub-Assembly
Learn More








Kitting
Learn More








Custom Packaging
Learn More























Products

Specialty Resources, Inc. will assist your company in reducing product costs, increasing production efficiency, and consolidating your supplier base. SRI currently supplies precision machined components, stampings, castings & forgings, rubber & plastics, seals, gaskets, springs, fabrications, cold headed products, specialty fasteners, and more.
View All Products










SRI Receives Supply Chain Award from Club Car
Jul. 13 2017


Press Release Chester Springs, PA, Jul. 13, 2017 – On June 6, 2017, Specialty Resources, Inc. received a supply chain award from Club Car & Ingersoll Rand in recognition of SRI’s outstanding contributions during 2016. The Performance Excellence award for Most Improved Supplier was accepted by the SRI team during Club Car’s annual Supplier Day at the Champion’s Retreat Golf Course located in Augusta, GA. In 2016, Specialty Resources (SRI) significantly improved in Year over Year KPI’s in addition to... Read more








SRI Earns Recognition as a John Deere Partner-Level Supplier
Jun. 13 2017


Press Release Chester Springs, PA – Specialty Resources, Inc. earned recognition as a Partner-Level Supplier for 2016 in the John Deere Achieving Excellence Program. The partner-level status is Deere & Company’s highest supplier rating.  The Chester Springs, PA based company was selected for the honor in recognition of its dedication to providing products and services of outstanding quality, as well as its commitment to continuous improvement. Company representatives accepted the recognition during formal ceremonies held in Davenport, IA. Specialty Resources... Read more








Benefits of Supplier Consolidation
Jun. 1 2017


Supplier Consolidation, or Vendor Consolidation, is a supply chain management strategy that has increased in popularity over the last decade. Supplier consolidation is the process of reducing suppliers within a specific supply market and focusing on the most successful suppliers within the same supply market. Aimed to reduce supply chain costs and improve efficiency, consolidating suppliers is a strategy that can be implemented by any industry. In addition, supplier consolidation can be implemented on the production and indirect levels. However, manufacturing... Read more








Total Cost of Ownership For Manufacturers
May. 11 2017


Total Cost of Ownership (TCO) is a management accounting concept that is used to calculate the costs that occur in your business. But what does (TCO) really mean for manufacturers? What is Total Cost of Ownership? For purchasing professionals in a manufacturing company, reducing production costs is your most important priority. If you reduce production costs, you can achieve greater profits for your company. But to determine the costs of producing a product, let’s say a car; it takes time and effort... Read more








Product Spotlight: Spray Nozzle Sub-Assembly
Sep. 24 2016


In today’s current competitive market, manufacturers continue to seek new ways to become more efficient and cost effective with their production processes. Unfortunately, many decision-makers are wearing too many hats and cannot allocate the time or resources to find a solution. However, SRI has helped many of our clients alleviate some of these problems by providing sub-assembly as a value-added service. One such sub-assembly includes the Spring Loaded Spray Nozzle shown below.   Product Information This Spray Nozzle is used... Read more










SRI is an ISO Certified Company
SRI specializes in global sourcing and inventory management of specialty components and precision products. To speak with a sales representative, contact us at (610) 321-0900 or click on Request a Quote to submit a drawing for immediate quotation.
Request a Quote








Request a Quote

Name*CompanyEmail*

Phone Number*Currently in ProductionCurrently in ProductionYesNoEstimated Annual UsageAttachments

Drop files here or 





Comments

 Submit 











This iframe contains the logic required to handle AJAX powered Gravity Forms.
 





















Assessments -Competitive Edge, Inc.Competitive Edge, Inc.
















































































 
People are what make up successful organizations, not processes!



About Judy

















   
       
             (770) 487-6460  








 Pages Navigation Menu
Home

About Judy Suiter
Philosophy
Testimonials
Client List
Distributorships
Strategic Partners


Assessments
Training & Speaking
Coaching
Products
Book Store
Cup of Joe with Judy
 







        Assessments          









Assessments
TTI Performance Systems, Ltd

TTI SUCCESS INSIGHTS®
TTI Success Insights is a suite of assessments with easy-to-understand narrative reports that provides highly targeted information. It is beneficial for developing self-awareness and improving communication among team members. One of the main purposes for using the TTI Success Insights assessments is to start a conversation. TTI Success Insights reports are available in multiple versions and 27 languages. See descriptions of the different versions available below.

TTI Success Insights Management-Staff ™
The Management-Staff assessment is a four-factor DISC behavioral assessment which can be used within your organization’s strategy to create a positive employee-manager relationship that directly affects productivity and goal achievement. This versatile management tool can be used to hire the right person, improve on-boarding, increase employee engagement, improve communication and build sound employee-manager relationships. The Management-Staff assessment report defines unique behavior and also guides the employee and manager in leveraging behavior for success. Its easy application is an extremely valuable contribution to talent management. It takes only 10 minutes to complete the 24-question online assessment and its insights and versatility make it an ideal tool.

Sample Report – Click Here


TTI Success Insights Sales
The Sales Report has a highly sales-oriented narrative geared toward helping evaluate the strengths, blind spots, communication styles and performance of new and existing salespeople. Managers will learn how to get the most from their sales teams and coach for maximum results as well as learn a reliable method for choosing winning salespeople who best fit the present needs and culture of the company. Employees will learn their selling strengths and areas needing improvement, their style of selling, how to handle objections, as well as tips for closing and servicing accounts.

Sample Report – Click Here


TTI Success Insights Team Building
You can call a group of individuals “a team,” but unless they communicate effectively, resolve differences and conflicts quickly, and produce desired/required results effectively and efficiently, the team will fall short of its fullest potential. In today’s fast-paced, high-pressure environment, business performance is achieved from extraordinary teams and can be enhanced by using the TTI Success Insights Team Building assessment. This assessment is beneficial for helping the team leader identify and harness individual energies, and effectively channel them towards group goals. The information in the report is presented in a non-threatening manner to encourage members to share reports, recognize team priorities, resolve disagreements, blend their styles and achieve team goals.

Sample Report – Click Here


TTI Success Insights Customer Service
Customer Service is the heart of any business. The report from this assessment reveals the range and reaches of a Customer Service team, as well as specific techniques for developing excellent communication with customers and improved overall team interaction. Teams will learn how to recognize different interactive styles and cater their service approach accordingly. A unique feature of this report is how to calm excited customers.

Sample Report – Click Here


TTI Success Insights Communicating with Style ™
How do you react and advance a conversation when presented with conversational obstacles? This abbreviated version of the Management-Staff assessment features situational strategies focusing on how to control these common interactions between individuals.

Sample Report – Click Here


TTI Success Insights Interviewing Insights ™
Available in either a Sales or General report, this assessment is designed to enhance the interviewing process by allowing you to get a snapshot of the applicant’s natural behavior, not just the adapted or masked behavior they might be using to get the job. The report from this assessment comes with suggested interview questions.

Sample General Report – Click Here
Sample Sales Report – Click Here


TTI Success Insights Work Environment ™
By prioritizing activities required for a particular job, the Work Environment Instrument graphically displays the behavioral demands of a job. A person’s natural or adapted behavior can then be compared to those required by the job to show if behavioral stress levels exist and to what extent. This is a very useful tool for identifying the behavior required for the job, ways to resolve conflicts in performance issues and comparing different individuals’ perceptions of the job. The resulting report can be used to benchmark the behavior required for high performance on a particular job. Think of this assessment as an “if the job could talk” tool.

Sample Report – Click Here


TTI Success Insights Sales Strategy Index ™
This assessment’s report answers the following questions regarding current or prospective sales personnel:

Do they understand the consultative selling process?
Can they sell? Will they sell? If so, how?
Are they treating each sales situation the way top salespeople should?

The Sales Strategy Index covers six different steps in the sales process: Prospecting, First Impressions, Qualifying, Demonstration, Influence and Closing. This is what the program will do for you:

Simplify sales training
Allow managing and coaching to be focused on the areas that produce results
Build confidence
Identify the sales strategy knowledge areas needed to sell a specific product/service in a given market
Identify sales applicant’s strengths and weaknesses
Identify specific training or management needs of a salesperson or sales force

This product is based on the Consultative Selling Model.

Sample Report – Click Here


MOTIVATOR REPORT
Motivators are the drivers behind our behavior; what motivates our actions. An individual’s experiences, references, education and training tell us WHAT they can do. A behavioral assessment will tell us HOW they will do it. However, it is not until we know an individual’s motivators that we will understand WHY they do what they do. This assessment measures your responses in each of the six attitudes. The online report shows each of the six attitudes compared to the national average. You are provided with information on the WHY of your actions, which, when applied, can tremendously impact the satisfaction you get out of life and your job.

TTI Success Insights Personal Motivation and Engagement 

By using the Personal Motivation and Engagement assessment, you will come to know and understand the attitudes that drive your actions and be better able to understand the causes of conflict in your life. You will understand and appreciate your relationships as you recognize the attitudes of other people. You will see how their attitudes might interact with your own and affect your communication and conflict resolution.

Sample Report – Click Here


TTI SUCCESS INSIGHTS TALENT INSIGHTS®
TTI Success Insights assessments that include Talent Insights combine both the DISC behavioral styles as well as the motivators to form a comprehensive analysis of an individual. Available in the general management version as well as a version specifically geared toward sales.
TTI Success Insights Talent Insights Management-Staff
As the assessment we use most often in our coaching and training, this assessment’s report combines the Success Insights Management-Staff Report with the Personal Motivation and Engagement Report, explaining the impact the top two behaviors and top two motivators have on each other. An added benefit of this report is the section identifying an individual’s time wasters, communication tips and areas of improvement.

Sample Report – Click Here


TTI Success Insights Talent Insights Sales
This report combines the Success Insights Sales Report with the Personal Motivation and Engagement Report, in regard specifically to sales. The last five pages of this assessment’s report provide deeper insight into the total person by explaining the impact that the top two behaviors and top two motivators have on each other. In addition, there is a portion to aid the individual in identifying their value to the organization, time wasters, communication do’s and don’ts and solution strategies.

Sample Report – Click Here


CAREER REPORT

TTI Career Planning Insights 
This report combines the DISC behavioral assessment with the Work Environment assessment plus the Ideal Work Environment Report to give respondents an in-depth view of their behavioral preferences and what jobs they would be best suited for depending upon the educational level achieved.

Sample Report – Click Here



PERSONAL AND FAMILY REPORT
TTI Relationship Insights ™
Effective communication is the core of all family relationships. This program was developed to assist every family in achieving the following objectives:

Identify and understand each individual’s natural behavior and communication style
Understand and appreciate other family members natural behavior and communication style
Blend one’s style with others for effective communication

An understanding of behavioral styles can dramatically improve the relationship between family members. With a report for the parent and young adult, each will have the knowledge they need to truly understand one another.

Sample Report – Click Here


REPORTS FOR EDUCATION – EXCELLENCE FOR LEARNING 
Quality education is a combined effort of teachers, administrators, students and parents. When all are working together in harmony, goals and objectives can be reached and rewarding results achieved. The goal of providing an optimal educational experience is compromised when conflicts arise within a given group. By learning to build effective relationships in the classroom, positive effects will be felt by everyone involved. With three different report types, each individual will have the tools they need to ensure a positive learning experience.

Excellence for Learning ™ – Administrator
Administrators should strive to be not just managers of people, but leaders of people. Because they wear many “hats” and have diverse responsibilities, they are required to be flexible and adaptive in their behavioral interactions. The more administrators are aware of their own behavioral tendencies as well as the tendencies of others, the more successfully they can be at fulfilling their important requirements and getting improved results from others. This report is recommended for use for Superintendent, Principal and Assistant levels.

Sample Report – Click Here


Excellence for Learning ™ – Teacher
Teachers are instructors in not only education but also in interpersonal interaction. They deal with many different behavioral and learning styles each day and can benefit immensely from understanding the tendencies of these different styles. They are then better able to create a supportive environment where growth and excellence can flourish.

Sample Report – Click Here


Excellence for Learning ™ – Student
The student report introduces the students to their communication preferences, the types of activities they like and offers guidance for improving study habits. It can also serve as a tool for increasing the student’s self-assurance which will aid in scholastic demands as well as interactions with friends. This report requires an eighth-grade reading level or above.

Sample Report – Click Here


EVERYTHING DiSC, A Wiley Brand

EVERYTHING DiSC®, A Wiley Brand, offers both manually scored and computerized learning tools as well as easy to use facilitator kits for all of their products. Specific profiles include the all new The Five Behaviors of a Cohesive Team ™, Everything DiSC® Management, Everything DiSC® Sales, Everything DiSC Workplace®, Everything DiSC Work of Leaders®, DiSC® Classic 2.0 Profile, Time Mastery Profile®, Team Dimension Profile®, Personal Listening Profile®, plus many more training aids.


The Five Behaviors of a Cohesive Team ™
This brand new assessment is comprehensive, highly personalized and accessible. It contains a 36-page illustrated report that allows each person on the team, and the team as a whole, to understand how they scored on the assessment and how to interpret their individual and team results. The profile includes an introduction, a section devoted to each of the five behaviors, a summary of the team’s strengths and challenges, tips and suggestions, and a road map to help teams create an action plan based on their results.

Sample Report – Click Here


Everything DISC® Management
With Everything DiSC® Management, managers will get a personalized report helping them to understand how to bring out the best in each of their employees. By learning how to read employee styles and adapt their own personal management style, they will become more effective delegating, giving direction, motivating and developing others. With DiSC based training, managers will learn how to provide resources, environments and opportunities that support long-term professional growth. The in-depth easily customizable modular design and online tailoring features allow you to design a program specifically for your organization.
The Everything DiSC Management Facilitation Kit includes:

Stand alone, menu-driven video of real-world manager specific interactions
Leader’s Guide in MS Word
PowerPoint with embedded video (33 Total)
Participant handouts in MS Word
Templates and images
Resources and research sections
Everything DiSC Management Interaction Guides A-121-02 (set of 25) – $24.00
Everything DiSC Management EPIC Online Profile – $90.00
Everything DiSC Management Facilitation Kit A-211 – $1,195.00


Sample Report – Click Here


Everything DISC® Sales
Better connecting with the customer will result in higher sales. Everything DiSC® Sales teaches salespeople how to adapt their personal sales style to the style of their customer, building stronger relationships and meeting their needs. The sales facilitation kit covers DiSC and sales priorities, customer mapping, customer buying priorities and adapting to meet the customer need. This profile comes with a 22-page sales specific report that helps sales people at all levels. Facilitator notes give tips to maximize learning. The kit is easily customizable by adding or deleting sections to fit any timeframe, switching out video clips and by modifying the PowerPoint, Leader’s Guide and the handouts.
The Everything DiSC Sales Facilitation Kit includes:

Stand-alone, menu-driven video
PowerPoint with embedded video
Leader’s Guides and participant handouts in MS Word
Templates and images
Sample Everything DiSC Sales Profile and Customer Interaction Map
Research documentation
Sales Interview Activity Card set (for 24 participants)
Everything DiSC Customer Interaction Guides (for 24 participants)
Everything DiSC Sales Customer Interaction Guides A-121-02 (set of 25) – $24.00
Everything DiSC Sales EPIC Online Profile – $90.00
Everything DiSC Sales Facilitation Kit A-121 – $1,195.00


Sample Report – Click Here


Everything DISC Workplace®
Improve the quality of the workplace by building more effective relationships one at a time. Everything DiSC Workplace® can be used with everyone in an organization regardless of their title or role in discovering and understanding their personal DiSC style as well as that of their counterparts. Strategies to overcome challenges as well as a people-reading module are included. Create unique presentations and reports for any time frame by easily adding, subtract or rearranging materials.
The Facilitation material contains 13 high-quality video clips demonstrating workplace interactions that can be used as stand-alone clips or integrated as part of a training program.
The Everything DiSC Workplace Facilitation Kit also includes:

Trainer’s guide in MS Word
PowerPoint slides with embedded video clips
Stand-alone menu-driven video clips
Participant handouts in MS Word
Templates and images
Sample Everything DiSC Workplace Profile
Additional research and resource sections to demonstrate validity
Everything DiSC Workplace Interation Guides A-311-02 (set of 25) – $24.00
Everything DiSC Workplace Style Guides A311-03 (set of 25) – $18.00
Everything DiSC Workplace EPIC Online Profile – $54.00
Everything DiSC Workplace Facilitation Kit A-311 – $1,195.00


Sample Report – Click Here


Everything DISC Work of Leaders®
Using the framework of Vision, Alignment and Execution, Everything DISC Work of Leaders® was developed by prominent leadership researchers in a four-year research and development effort with the goal of better understanding leadership behaviors and how they impact effectiveness. Compelling narrative adds depth to the data and strong visuals support the learning process by illustrating key messages.
The Everything DiSC Work of Leaders Facilitation Kit also includes:

Five 60-90 minute modules
Fully scripted Leader’s Guide, with supporting presentation and participant handouts
Seventeen all-new leadership-focused videos
Everything DiSC Work of Leaders Wall Posters P-401 (set of 8 different posters) – $100.00
Everything DiSC Work of Leaders EPIC Online Profile – $90.00
Everything DiSC Work of Leaders Facilitation Kit A-401 – $1,195.00


Sample Report – Click Here



DISC® CLASSIC 2.0 PROFILE
The DiSC® Classic 2.0 profile can untangle the unknown and lead to more satisfying relationships with others, both on a personal and workplace level. It can help individuals in organizations improve performance and deal more effectively with conflict and style differences. Recognized as one of today’s most powerful personal growth tools, it provides the foundation for understanding oneself and others and the impact on each. This assessment has provided the key to successful communication and relationships for over 30 years to over 40 million users worldwide.
DiSC Classic 2.0 contains reports that include:

The individual and groups composite DiSC styles as well as information on how it affects the organization’s culture
At-a-glance comparisons of individual profiles
Strategies for creating a positive relationship
Relating to people and the environment
Approach to selling and sales management
DISC Classic 1.0- EPIC Online Profile – $36.00
DISC Classic 2.0- EPIC Online Profile – $36.00
DISC Classic 2 Plus- EPIC Online Profile – $72.00
DISC Classic Facilitator Report- EPIC Online Profile – $54.00
DISC Classic Group Culture Report- EPIC – $54.00
DISC Classic Facilitation System, Version 3.5 supports MS Office 2010 Q-594 – $1,675.00
DISC Classic DVD D-591 – $895.00
DISC Classic People-Reading Guide P-593 (set of 25, folded) – $24.00



TIME MASTERY PROFILE®
Setting priorities and managing time are vital to enhancing individual and organizational performance. If you could reduce your staff’s wasted time by just five minutes every hour, productivity would jump 8.3 percent!
Efficiency levels would also rise as employees devoted more time to completing critical tasks. The Time Mastery Profile® is a unique tool providing people with a complete self-directed assessment of their current time-management effectiveness and provides data to help determine where efforts can be focused for more efficiency, both personally and professionally.
A skills analysis is given in 12 key areas, which includes attitudes, goals, priorities, analyzing, planning, scheduling, interruptions, meetings, written communications, delegation, procrastination and team time. Immediate feedback is graphed to show the areas in which skill improvement is needed, and an action plan is devised facilitating a change in unproductive habits.
Included in the Facilitator’s Kit are Leader’s guides, PowerPoint presentations and Handouts.

Time Mastery Profile – EPIC Online – $36.00
Time Mastery Profile Online Facilitator’s Report – B-345-GR – $54.00
Time Mastery Profile Facilitator’s Kit – B-345 – $600.00



TEAM DIMENSIONS PROFILE®
The Team Dimensions Profile® measures what each team member “brings to the table” in terms of behavioral styles and the ability to work together. It also identifies the team role best-suited for the individual through the use of a four quadrant grid. Understanding and capitalizing on individual approaches to group processes is vital to creating high-performance teams and can help build a more productive and satisfying team environment.
By capitalizing on individual strengths you can improve the total team performance. The Team Dimensions Profile helps teams in your organization:

Identify individual strengths and approaches to teamwork
Clarify team members’ roles
Reinforce the contributions of every team member
Reduce project cycle time and increase productivity
Team Dimensions Profile – Manually scored paper version – C-463 – $21.50
Team Dimensions Profile 2.0- EPIC Online – $36.00
Team Dimensions Profile 2.0 Group Report- EPIC Online – $54.00
Team Dimensions Hit the Mark Score Pads I-B45 – $4.30
Team Dimensions Facilitator’s Kit – B-463 – $600.00


PERSONAL LISTENING PROFILE®
More than simple “hearing,” listening is the ability to receive, attend to, interpret and respond to verbal and non-verbal messages. The Personal Listening Profile® is a self-directed learning instrument that helps individuals to identify their preferred listening approach and to develop another listening approach that may be more appropriate to the situation at hand. By using the best listening approach for the situation, overall communication will improve.

Personal Listening Profile- EPIC Online – $36.00
Personal Listening Profile Online Facilitator’s Report – $54.00
Personal Listening Profile Facilitator’s Kit – B-317 – $600.00


Multi-Health Systems, Inc. (EQ-i)

Emotional Intelligence is defined as “a set of emotional and social skills that influence the way we perceive and express ourselves, develop and maintain social relationships, cope with challenges and use emotional information in an effective and meaningful way.”
The EQ-i is the first scientifically validated Emotional Intelligence (EI) tool in the world. It is highly effective in the training and development of your current employees and leaders and can also critically aid with the selection of highly qualified future leaders for your organization.


The EQ-i 2.0® Assessment
Studies have shown Emotional Quotient Inventory (EQ-i 2.0) can be a verifiable reflection of one’s overall well-being and ability to succeed in life. Unlike Intelligence Quotient (IQ), which is a relatively static measurement in adulthood, Emotional Intelligence can be developed and changed over time. Evaluating and then working to develop an individual’s EQ-i can dramatically improve their interaction with others, performance at work and leadership potential. Although other factors contribute to a person’s overall potential and performance, the level of someone’s EQ-i is a key indicator of what they will be able to offer. EQ-i 2.0 is a highly effective employee development tool because it not only identifies development potential and pitfalls but also provides targeted strategies needed to make improvements. It can be useful for companies in the recruitment and retention of successful, emotionally healthy employees as well.

EQ-i 2.0 Workplace Sample Client Report – Click Here


EQ-i 2.0 Workplace Sample Coach Report – Click Here



The EQ 360® Assess­ment
A client’s social and emotional functioning are identified by his or her own responses in the EQ-i 2.0, but the EQ 360 assessment gives a more complete, comprehensive analysis by also utilizing information anonymously provided by others who know the client. Clear alignment with EQ-i 2.0 makes the results easy to understand and interpret. The reports are structured in a very clear and linear manner that is easy to reference and follow and includes not only the feedback of all the raters but also the participant’s feedback consolidated into one report. By getting feedback from others, the individual is able to see themselves from a different perspective which is often different than their own self-perception and can go a long way in helping them improve not only as a person but also as a leader. There is also an EQ 360 Leadership assessment available to provide the most comprehensive look into an individual’s level of emotional intelligence, providing insight into their leadership abilities and how others view them in leadership roles.

EQ 360 Sample Client Report – Click Here


EQ 360 Sample Coach Report – Click Here


EQ 360 Leadership Sample Client Report – Click Here


EQ 360 Leadership Sample Coach Report – Click Here


EQ-i 2.0® Leadership Report
With a flexible, customizable framework, the EQ-i 2.0 Leadership allows you to create a report that is catered to your preferred leadership model, quickly pinpointing what you find important. The report is leader specific, ensuring relevance and results for your organization. Best practices and strategies for action make the model practical and drive developmental results. In addition, a specific benchmark comparing leaders to other top leaders will help your company gain a competitive advantage.

EQ-i 2.0 Leadership Sample Client Report – Click Here


EQ-i 2.0 Leadership Sample Coach Report – Click Here


PeopleClues

PeopleClues is a worldwide provider of cutting edge behavioral assessments for businesses. It can be integrated into the applications and processes you already use to hire, train and promote the right people for the right jobs more effectively. Easy to use and affordable for both large and small companies, PeopleClues provides custom benchmarking, applicant ranking and data mining in a modern, online, validated behavioral assessment that is sure to make a positive impact in your company before the hire and after. The four types of reports used in the PeopleClues assessments are Personality, Attitude, Engagement and Onboarding.
Pre-Hire Selection Reports Available:
Attitude Report – CandidClues
The Attitude tool measures underlying behaviors of potential employees and reveals their attitude toward work and work-related issues. You will be able to identify the level of concern regarding candidate’s attitudes in six critical areas:

Hostility – Describes the degree to which a person is not able to suppress angry feelings.
Conscientiousness (Dependability) – Describes the degree to which the individual is persistent, organized and motivated ranging from being highly disciplined and dependable to being carefree and lackadaisical.
Integrity – Likelihood a person is to short-change customers, falsify expense accounts, lie to protect themselves or engage in other acts of dishonesty.
Good Impression – A validity scale that measures the degree to which the person has responded truthfully verses responding in such a way to make a good impression.
Sexual Harassment (Optional) – The likelihood that this person will make sexual remarks, tell dirty jokes or otherwise behave inappropriately at work.
Computer Misuse (Optional) – Describes the possibility that the candidate will abuse the organization’s computer policy by sending or receiving personal emails, surfing the web or handling person business.
Substance Abuse (Optional) – Calculates the possibility this person will use illegal drugs or drink alcohol while at work or before work and the safety risks they will impose because of impaired judgment.

The Attitude assessment will help significantly shorten your interview process by providing explanation of the results including graphs and interview questions based specifically on the candidate’s responses during the pre-hire selection phase.

Sample Report – Click Here


Personality Job Fit – JobClues
You will waste a lot of time and energy if you are interviewing people who aren’t right for the job. With the Job Fit tool, you will be able to understand right away if a candidate’s personality and cognitive abilities are the right fit for the position, improving your quality of hire and reducing the search time. Choose from over 100+ job categories and create benchmarks specific to your company. This tool makes use of the Job Fit percentage score as well as population bell curves to evaluate a candidate’s fit for a particular job including custom behavioral interview questions.
Scales Measured:

Conscientious vs. Carefree
Likeable vs. Tough-Minded
Un-Conventional vs. Rules Oriented
Extroversion vs. Introverted
Stability vs. Sensitivity


Sample Report – Click Here


Post-Hire Reports Available:
Onboarding
It is the goal of every employer to maximize a new employee’s performance and help them become productive as quickly as possible. By utilizing the Onboarding tool, managers can better understand the learning style and personality of new hires, shortening the honeymoon period. Knowledge of how well a new employee takes direction and adapts to change will allow supervisors to implement more effective training. Tips are also included to improve performance and training and coaching.

Coaching
The Coaching tool will help a manager better understand the behavioral tendencies and learning styles of the trainee. By teaching them to tailor their coaching to the individual, an increase in productivity and improved performance will be experienced. When a supervisor understands how an employee responds to change and new information, they can cater their teaching approach in order for the learning experience will be more effective. Critical information and tips are included in the areas of “Learning New Information,” “Making Presentations” and “Taking Direction.”

Leadership Development
Just because someone is a good manager does not mean they will be a good leader. Do they have the ability to motivate? Are they engaging presenters? Do they have the characteristics and skills to be an effective leader including competencies in problem solving, decision making and motivating others? Although you can train for some of this, there are “measurable” key core characteristics that make this a more natural role for some. Identify the individual with core leadership characteristics and dissect areas where the most assistance is needed.

Engagement
When employees are engaged they tend to be loyal to their employers and see their jobs as a source of enjoyment and pride, aspiring to go above and beyond their job descriptions to meet the goals of the business at large. The Engagement tool helps reveal a candidate’s commitment to the job and employer, and if they are capable of being motivated and engaged. Included are dynamic interview questions and a summary statement.
Brain Technologies Corporation

The mCircle Instrument®
The mCircle is a conflict-style discovery and dilemma resolution tool that reveals an individual’s typical conflict resolution style. It will explain in detail the most powerful of the mCircle strategies and when they should be used. By changing the frame— that is the perspective, expectations, attitudes—something quite new and different may appear and all or much of what was been seen before may disappear.
The BrainMap®
Nothing is more valuable than a rapid-read self-navigational tool like The BrainMap when training participants are faced with the need to do something different or are confronted by situations highly in flux. The BrainMap is superbly equipped to jumpstart important and needed conversations when teams get stalemated or frustrated by the complexity or obscurity of the realities they face. Online version is now available.

MindMaker6®
MindMaker6 is an unmatched world-view analyzer. For anyone facing life-altering moves or significant leadership challenges, this versatile tool provides vital information on how the way you see the world colors and influences the bigger picture: all your relationships, your most closely held personal principles, your goals and expectations, your strategies and tactics and your very sense of self-worth.

Path Primer®
The unknown is much greater than the known. That’s why it can be so perplexing and challenging for a person or, for that matter, an organization, to solve the riddle of existence. What is this organization about? What is my (our) purpose in being here? If you can’t explain why you are here, you may have little sense of where to focus and how to find important allies, resources and opportunities.

Asset Report®
The Asset Report is a self-guidance, custom-crafted personalized “book of you” report offering you a refreshing new degree of personal clarification. If you have any doubts at all as to who you are, what’s causing your behavior, what brings you satisfaction, which tangible and intangible rewards are important to you, what is meaningful and purposeful for you, the Asset Report can remove many of these quandaries in a single, initial eye-opening quick read. Online version only.
Barrett Values Centre
One of the most detailed and comprehensive cultural diagnostics and values assessment instruments available, the Cultural Transformation Tools (CTT) can help leaders, consultants and coaches build high-performance, values-driven cultures that attract and keep talented people and increase staff engagement.
The Barrett Model is a reworking of Maslow’s model of the hierarchy of human needs. Every human being on the planet evolves and grows in consciousness in seven well-defined stages. With each stage focusing on a particular need common to us all. The level of growth and development of an individual is dependent on their ability to satisfy these seven existential needs.

Cultural Values Assessment (CVA)
By having the individuals in your company take 15 minutes to answer three simple questions, you will be able to have a comprehensive diagnostic of the culture of your organization. The CVA will provide you with a detailed understanding of the personal motivations of employees, their experience within your organization and the direction the organization could or should be heading.
CVA results can generate deep, meaningful conversations about the purpose, priorities and strategies of the organization, and give you a road map for achieving flexibility and sustainability. The survey can be customized to the specific cultural and demographic needs of the groups being surveyed. There is no limit to the number of group categories you can choose and the survey is available in multiple languages.

Personal Values Assessment (PVA)
Who you are, what you hold dear, what upsets you and what motivates your decisions are all connected to your personal values. By coming to understand our values, we can better understand why we act and react the way we do. When we go against our values, we may feel as though we are not being true to ourselves, but living our values can give us a sense of balance.
The Personal Values Assessment is simple survey that takes just a few minutes of your time and provides a wealth of information. Exercises in the report help you better understand your values.
Prevue HR Systems

The process of intelligently choosing, keeping and motivating staff is one of the most difficult tasks a company can face and one of the most costly. Do you know how much employee turnover is costing you? Well-researched surveys reveal that it can cause monetary damages of up to 35% or more of the annual salary for most positions, not to mention the wasted time and energy on dealing with bad hires instead of helping good hires excel. By using the Prevue Assessment to identify and quantify the important qualities, learning abilities, interests and work-related personality traits of employees, your company will experience increased productivity and a reduction in costly turnovers.
The most common model to measure preferred behavioral styles is known as the “Big Five.” It identifies five personality dimensions: Openness (Unconventional), Conscientiousness, Extraversion, Agreeableness (Likeable) and Neuroticism (Stable) or “OCEAN” for short. These five independent factors can normally be found distributed across large groups of adults and are easily defined:

Openness (Unconventional): How adventurous or open to new ideas a person is: curious, unstructured, venturesome to predictable, closed or structured, rules-oriented.
Conscientiousness: How persistent, motivated and organized an individual is: highly dependable and disciplined or lackadaisical and carefree.
Extraversion: Measures what the focus of a person’s emotional energy is: outgoing, dominant, social and ambitious or shy, quiet and introverted.
Agreeableness (Likeable): How pleasant and agreeable a person is: warm, tolerant and tactful or assertive, tough-minded, direct and skeptical.
Neuroticism (Stable): Involves the degree to which a person is emotionally stable and resistant to stress: self-confident, calm, adjusted and poised or at the other extreme; often anxious and nervous.

Prevue offers a critical feature many assessments don’t. By making use of the completely automated Prevue Benchmarks, you will be given a Selection Report that not only analyzes the work-related characteristics of the candidates, but also contains a customizable comparison of their traits to the traits of someone ideally qualified for the position. Prevue will allow you to build Benchmarks easily, quickly and economically for all the positions within your company by analyzing the characteristics of top performers in a given position, as well as using management surveys.
Not only does the Prevue Assessment help with incoming job applicants, but it can provide valuable insight into the abilities, interests, motivations and personalities of current employees. When you ensure your organization is meeting the needs of its staff, you will notice an increase in overall job satisfaction and loyalty, and a decrease in turnover. Additionally, Prevue benchmarks can be compared to each employee’s results to reveal areas requiring additional training and coaching and a succession plan can be developed to map out future openings within you company. With this knowledge you will be able to promote wisely from within your organization with employees who have been identified and trained in advance.

Hiring and Retention Solutions Reports:
Selection Report
The Prevue Benchmark is compared to an individual’s assessment to illustrate their personal suitability for a position. Each applicant is given a “Job Suitability” score when compared to an ideal profile and behavioral interview questions are provided to assist management in delving into the areas of concern that might have been revealed.

Sample Report – Click Here


Working Characteristics Report
Complements the Selection Report by providing insight into a candidate’s business-related behavior and answers five questions:

What is this person’s perception of the world?
How does this person want to be paid?
How does this person deal with change?
What priority does this person give to work?
Does this person make risky decisions?


Development and Coaching Solutions Reports:
Personal Development Report
Catering to a specific position, this assessment assists management in coaching and developing employees. With insight and training tips, an employee’s effectiveness can be maximized in a new or existing position.

Corporate Coach
Available in a “Coach” or “Candidate” version, this report contains tips designed for executive coaches. Nine important related areas dealing with an executive’s approach are:

Focus on work: works to live vs. lives to work
Approach to new ventures: cautious vs. optimistic
Leadership style: democratic vs. commanding
Preference to change: likes routine vs. likes change
Approach to conflict: forceful vs. accommodating
Compensation preference: fixed salary vs. commission/bonus
Approach to self promotion: reluctant vs. assured
Approach to risk taking: careful vs. daring
Approach to listening: controlling vs. sympathetic

There are also sixteen individual personality and interest characteristics for the executive:

Working with people
Working with data
Working with things
Diplomatic/ Independent
Cooperative/ Competitive
Submissive/ Assertive
Spontaneous/ Conscientious
Innovative/ Conventional
Reactive/ Organized
Introvert/ Extrovert
Self-Sufficient/ Group-Oriented
Reserved/ Outgoing
Emotional/ Stable
Restless/ Poised
Excitable/ Relaxed
Social Desirability


Succession/Career Planning Report
Answers the question, “What is the best fit for this employee within our company?” by defining and comparing the employee’s personality traits, interests and abilities to the Prevue Benchmark for various jobs within the organization.

Individual Report
A simple report comparing an individual’s assessment to that of the general working population.

Succession Planning and Promotion Solutions Reports:
Succession Planning Report
Uses Prevue Benchmark to match the best employee for a position within your company based on their individual abilities, personality traits, and interests. Available in a Multi-Candidate or Multi-Position format.

Personal Development Report
Position-based report providing training tips and insight for management to develop employees and to be fully staffed with the right people in the right jobs within the organization.
 
DISC
QUICK PROFILE ASSESSMENT
In order to correctly read the signals people give us, individuals must have some understanding of themselves and others. This sample Quick Profile Assessment is designed to give you a small glimpse of insight into yourself. This exercise utilizes a four-factor model commonly referred to as DISC, which is based on the book The Emotions of Normal People by William Moulton Marston.
By answering 2 simple questions, you will get a general idea of your predominant style – D, I, S or C. Please select ONE answer below to begin.
I am Extroverted or I am Introverted
Not sure what the meaning of Extroverted or Introverted is?

 






Upcoming Certifications and Seminars EQ-i Training Workshop: September 28-29, 2017 
Click Here to Download September 2017 EQ-i Registration Form
Train-the-Trainer Workshop: November 7-9, 2017 
Click Here to Download November 2017 Train-the-Trainer Registration Form

Cup of Joe with Judy 
Interview with Judy 
Bookstore Click Here to View Our Bookstore














Contact Us Competitive Edge, Inc.
P.O. Box 724705
Atlanta, GA 31139
Phone: (770) 487-6460
Fax: (770) 319-0313
judy@CompetitiveEdgeInc.com





What We Do Serving Corporate America since 1981 with expertise in Advanced Behavioral and Organizational Strategies





Favorite Quote "The problems are always in the numbers, but the solutions are always in the people" - Mark Welker














Home
Assessments
Training & Speaking
Coaching
Products
Book Store
Testimonials
 












© Copyright 2016 - Competitive Edge, Inc. | Privacy Policy 





















